Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 24 Children With Disabilities
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-24-1.
Duty of school committee to provide special education.

In any city or town where there is a child with a disability within the age range as designated by the regulations of the state board of education who is functionally limited to such an extent that normal educational growth and development is prevented, the school committee of the city or town where the child resides shall provide the type of special education that will best satisfy the needs of the child with a disability, as recommended and approved by the state board of education in accordance with its regulations governing the education of children with disabilities.

Notwithstanding any other federal or state law or regulation, the school committee where a parentally placed child who has, or develops, a disability in private school resides, shall provide the child with the same free and appropriate education as it provides to children in public schools. These children shall have the same rights and remedies in the regulations of the board of education governing the education of children with disabilities as children in public school relative to initially determining eligibility, implementation, and/or any other rights and remedies relative to any special education services the child may be eligible to receive from the public school district.

For the purpose of this statute, a parentally placed child who has, or develops, a disability in private school is defined as a child enrolled or placed in a private school by the unilateral decision of his or her parents and without consultation of the public school district, who either has, or at some point while at the private school is diagnosed with, a learning disability. Parents who unilaterally enroll their child in a private school are required to pay the tuition costs related to the child’s education that are unrelated to the child’s disability, and the public school district where the child resides is responsible for payment of the services related to the child’s disability as developed and determined in the child’s individual education plan.

For the purpose of this statute, a free and appropriate education is defined as special education services and related services that:

Are provided at public expense, under public supervision and direction, and without charge;

Meet all of the standards and requirements of the state of Rhode Island department of education and requirements of the regulations of the board of education governing the education of children with disabilities, which shall include initial evaluation and determination procedures;

Include preschool, elementary school, or secondary school education in the state; and

Are provided in conformity with an individualized education program that meets the requirements of the regulations of the board of education governing the education of children with disabilities.

In those cases that an individual education plan has been adopted for a child and the child moves to another town or city, the plan shall remain in effect until a new plan is adopted for the child in the new town or city.

A child with a disability as referenced in subsection (a) of this section shall have available to them any benefits provided by this section up to their twenty-first birthday, in accordance with the student’s individualized education program (IEP). Provided, in the event such a child with a disability is enrolled in a postsecondary or transitional educational program as part of the services provided to the child by the school committee or local education agency (LEA), and such child reaches twenty-one (21) years of age during a school or program year, then the school committee’s or LEA’s obligation to pay for the postsecondary or transitional program shall continue through to the conclusion of the school or program’s academic year, in accordance with the student’s individualized education program. Not later than sixty (60) calendar days prior to the child turning twenty-one (21) years of age, the local educational agency (LEA) shall provide the child and the parent or guardian with notice explaining the rights under this section that remain in effect at age twenty-one (21). Further, not later than sixty (60) calendar days prior to the child turning twenty-one (21) years of age, the state adult service agencies responsible for planning, funding and providing services and supports for adults with developmental disabilities, including the state office of rehabilitation services (ORS) and the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH), shall provide the child and the parent or guardian with notice of the obligations and responsibilities that the respective agency owes to eligible recipients along with a level of funding and/or an individual support plan for the child twenty-one (21) years of age to receive. This section shall not be used to delay or defer the obligation of a state agency responsible for providing services to this population.

For purposes of providing services under this chapter, “special education” shall have the same meaning as used in 34 C.F.R. § 300.39 and includes speech-language pathology services for students among the other services and supports provided for therein. The provision of speech-language pathology services shall not cease or be terminated solely because a child has attained nine (9) years of age or greater, if those services are still warranted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3368, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-1

; P.L. 1996, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 26; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 38; P.L. 2016, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 8; P.L. 2022, ch. 100, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 101, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

16-24-2.
Regulations of state board.

It shall be the duty of the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education to set up regulations for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this chapter; and the regulations shall also be applicable in the administration of all educational programs operated and/or supported by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, human services, and corrections; the department of children, youth, and families and the board of regents shall report to the attorney general for the purpose of enforcing any noncompliance with its regulations for special education. The regulations shall include:

Criteria to determine who is to be included in the category of a child with a disability and all persons from the age of three (3) to twenty-one (21) years who are functionally limited to such an extent that normal educational growth and development is prevented must be included in establishing the category of a child with a disability;

Minimum criteria for establishment and/or reimbursement of special facilities (such as public school classes, hospital schools, etc.) for each category of exceptionality;

Standard accounting procedures including a uniform system of accounts for the determination of the cost of special education and standard reporting requirements, both subject to the prior written approval of the auditor general, and methods of reimbursement;

Teacher training recommendations and minimum teacher qualifications;

Transportation;

Provisions permitting parents, public education agencies, certified public school teachers, support personnel, and their authorized representatives to appeal decisions made pursuant to the regulations; and

Any other regulations the state board of regents deems necessary to implement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 2; P.L. 1954, ch. 3368, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-2

; P.L. 1971, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 130, § 6; P.L. 1987, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 39, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 26; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 26; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 38.

16-24-3.
Annual census of children with disabilities.

The school committee of every city and town shall annually ascertain, under regulations prescribed by the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education, in cooperation with the directors of human services and behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the number of children residing in the town or city of school age who have disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3464, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-3

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 26; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 26; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 38.

16-24-4.
Transportation.

The school committee of each city and town shall provide for the transportation to and from school either within the school district or in another school district of the state for any child who has a disability in accordance with the regulations of the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 4; P.L. 1954, ch. 3368, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-4

; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 26; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 26.

16-24-5.
Joint facilities for special instruction.

Wherever possible and practical two (2) or more cities or towns may organize in providing educational facilities in a district center for the children in the respective cities or towns who are in need of special care and individual instruction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-5

.

16-24-6.
Special education fund — Allocations to communities.

The state shall make available to the communities a special education fund to be appropriated annually for allocation to the communities for noncapital expenses for special education of children with disabilities in accordance with the regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. The cost of special education, including evaluation, support services, and training, including the cost of special education personnel, materials and equipment, tuition, transportation, rent, and contractual services, of the children in the program continuum placements provided under §

16-24-2

shall be paid by the state to the city or town at the same times provided in §

16-7-17

based on the financial and census data for the second school year preceding; provided, however, that the amount of the payment for special education pupils in each of the particular program placements shall not exceed one hundred and ten percent (110%) of the state median for special education pupils in that same placement. In determining the applicable state median expenditure for special education pupils for the purpose of this section, the board of regents shall under §

16-24-2

differentiate between types of program continuum placements on the basis of the amount of time a child requires special programs outside of the regular classroom to meet his or her particular needs, the ratio of personnel to pupils required for the programs, and the efficiency and economy of operating the programs. The board of regents may distribute the payments through the cooperative service arrangements provided for under chapter 3.1 of this title. The payments shall be made only after approval and certification by the board of regents that the payments are made pursuant to this section, that cost of special education has been determined and reported in accordance with the standard accounting and reporting procedures provided for in subdivision (3) of § 16-24-2, and that the program placements have met the regulations and requirements prescribed by the board of regents. The auditor general shall audit these payments and report, in writing, any exceptions to the board of regents and to the joint committee on legislative services.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall make a continuous evaluation of the operation of this section and at least once every three (3) years the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall review the findings of the commissioner and shall make its recommendations in writing to the governor and to the general assembly.

The general assembly shall appropriate to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated for each fiscal year that sum needed to carry out the purpose of this section; provided, that for each fiscal year following 1987-1988, the total appropriation for this purpose shall not be less than eight percent (8%) over the appropriation for the preceding fiscal year. For each fiscal year commencing 1992-1993, the total appropriation for this purpose shall not be less than one hundred percent (100%) of the approved special education excess expenditures. All entitlements except those in §

16-24-6.2

shall be ratably reduced if less than one hundred percent (100%) of the expenditures appropriated. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or so much of it as may be required from time to time upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

This chapter contemplates that expenses for special education for children with disabilities will be determined in accordance with standard accounting and reporting procedures required pursuant to §

16-24-2(3)

, and will be separable from expenses with respect to which state financial support is provided in §

16-7-20

; the same expenses may not be counted twice, that is, once for the purpose of §

16-7-20

and again for the purpose of this chapter. The allocations herein are subject to review and adjustment by the auditor general on the basis of more accurate census or other data that may be obtained by him or her.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall deduct and retain the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) from the amount appropriated under subsection (c) of this section. This sum, which will serve as the state match to federal funds, shall be used by the department of elementary and secondary education to enter into an agreement with the division of vocational rehabilitation to procure the services of vocational rehabilitation counselors for special education students in the public schools, and the agreement shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 130, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 6; P.L. 1987, ch. 288, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 558, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 26; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 26; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 42.

16-24-6.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 39, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 5, effective July 1, 1992.

16-24-6.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 43, § 4; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 77, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 16, effective August 9, 1996.

16-24-7.
“Mentally retarded minors” defined.

The term “mentally retarded minors” means all children between the age of three (3) and twenty-one (21) who because of retarded intellectual development, as determined by an individual multidisciplinary evaluation, require specialized instruction appropriate to their individual capacity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3464, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-7

; P.L. 1976, ch. 221, § 1.

16-24-8, 16-24-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3464, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

16-24-8

, 16-24-9; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 221, § 2.

16-24-10.
Arrangements by cities and towns having small numbers of retarded children.

Each city and town which contains fewer than eight (8) mentally retarded minors may contract with another city or town for the education of the minors or may establish a special class pursuant to the previous provision with the consent of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. In the event that a city or town does not establish a class for fewer than eight (8) mentally retarded minors or contract with another city or town, then the city or town shall contract with a suitable day school for instruction adapted to the mental attainments of the minors; provided that the day schools shall be subject to the regulations and supervision of the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3464, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-10

.

16-24-11.
Transportation for retarded children.

Transportation shall be provided for all pupils attending a special class or suitable day schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3464, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-11

.

16-24-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3463, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-12

; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-24-13.
Classes for children with disabilities in state residential facilities and institutions.

Classes for children with disabilities as described in the regulations of the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall be provided for those children in all the state institutions and also in state operated and state supported facilities where children with disabilities reside subject to all regulations of the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3464, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-24-13

; P.L. 1976, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 26; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 26.

16-24-14, 16-24-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2905, §§ 6, 8; P.L. 1954, ch. 3368, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3464, § 2; G.L. 1956, §§

16-24-14

, 16-24-15; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12, and P.L. 1966, ch. 220, § 1.

16-24-16.
Approved centers.

For the purpose of furnishing transportation and providing incidental expenses for the education of mentally retarded children under the age of eighteen (18), a center approved by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be decreed to be a school as considered in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 322, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 38.

16-24-17.
Payment for services.

No school district shall pay to any provider of either health or educational services to children with disabilities under this title any charges in excess of the rate currently being charged by the provider to any other public or private purchaser for the basic services, including any charges for room and board, nor shall the school district pay any charges in excess of the rate currently being charged by the provider to any other public or private purchaser for any other services deemed necessary by the individual education program. The school districts may request from the provider one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the start of their fiscal year a rate for services to be rendered for the ensuing fiscal year and the providers shall not change the rates during the ensuing fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 26; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 26.

16-24-18.
Transition from school to self-sufficient adulthood for students with disabilities.

There is established within the department of elementary and secondary education an interagency transition council (the “transition council”) composed of:

The administrators or their designees of the following:

Department of human services — office of rehabilitation services;

Department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals — division of developmental disabilities;

Department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals — division of behavioral healthcare;

Department of children, youth, and families;

Department of elementary and secondary education — office of student, community and academic supports;

Department of elementary and secondary education — office of adult and career and technical education;

Department of labor and training — human resource investment council;

Department of health — division of community, family health, and equity; and

Commissioner of higher education or his or her designee; and

Two (2) young persons with disabilities, two (2) parents of young persons with disabilities, and two (2) representatives of local school districts and one transition coordinator from one of the regional educational collaboratives, appointed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

One representative of community-based providers of services to adults with developmental disabilities and one representative of community-based providers of adult behavioral healthcare services, appointed by the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The goal of the transition council is to ensure the preparedness of students with disabilities, upon leaving school, to live and work in the community.

The transition council shall draft and propose periodic revisions to the cooperative agreement among the state departments and offices for the provisions of services in the transition of young persons with disabilities from school to self-sufficient adult life. The directors of the state departments and agencies shall sign the cooperative agreement and any revisions, prior to their implementation. The transition council shall oversee the implementation of the cooperative agreement. The council shall issue guidelines or instructions and recommend to the state departments and agencies appropriate directives necessary to effectuate the implementation of the cooperative agreement. The transition council shall develop joint plans for state departments and agencies and local school districts for providing transition services to assist young persons with disabilities. The transition council shall, after hearing from the public, issue an annual report to the governor, children’s cabinet, and general assembly on the status of transition services and recommendations for improving opportunities for young persons with disabilities to make a successful transition from school to self-sufficient adult life.

Individualized transition planning will be initiated by the school district to include the young person with a disability, guardian, general education and special education personnel as appropriate, career and technical education, and representatives of any party to the delivery and implementation of the individual plan. Transition planning will begin by age fourteen (14) or younger if determined appropriate in the individualized education program, for each eligible young person with a disability and shall be reviewed and updated annually.

As used in this section:

“Transition services” means a coordinated set of activities for a young person with a disability, designed within an outcome oriented process, that promotes movement from school to post-school activities including postsecondary education, vocational training, integrated employment (including supported employment), continuing and adult education, adult services, independent living, or community participation. The activities shall be based on the needs of the individual young person with a disability, taking into account the young person with a disability’s preferences and interests; and shall include needed activities in the areas of:

Instruction:

Community experiences;

The development of employment and other post-school adult living objectives; and

If appropriate, acquisition of daily living skills and functional vocational evaluation.

“Young person(s) with a disability” means those students:

Evaluated in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as having mental retardation, hearing impairments including deafness, speech or language impairments, visual impairments including blindness, serious emotional disturbance, orthopedic impairments, autism, traumatic brain injury, other health impairments, specific learning disabilities, deaf-blindness, or multiple disabilities; or

Who because of those impairments needs special education and related services, and

Age fourteen (14) or younger if determined appropriate in the individualized education program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 466, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 244, § 1.